Hawaii statutes.
§231-14 Attorney. The attorney general
shall assign one of the attorney general's deputies as attorney and legal
advisor and representative of the director of taxation. The attorney may
proceed to enforce payment of any delinquent taxes by any means provided by
law. Any legal proceeding may be instituted in the name of the director or the
director's deputy, the collector of the district in which the delinquency
exists, or in the name of the collector of delinquent taxes. [L 1933, c 135,
§3; RL 1935, §1967; am L 1937, c 241, §2; RL 1945, §5119; RL 1955, §115-19; am
L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16; am L 1967, c 37, §1; HRS §231-14; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next